Massachusetts, session 194th, S1370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after Section 29C, the following new section:-
Section 29C1/2. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:-
"Service provider”, a person providing services under a snow removal and ice control
services contract.
"Service receiver", a person receiving services under a snow removal and ice control
services contract.
of 2

"Snow removal and ice control services contract", a contract or agreement for the
performance of any of the following: (1) plowing, shoveling, or other removal of snow or other
mixed precipitation from a surface; (2) de-icing services; or (3) a service incidental to an activity
described in item (1) or (2), including operating or otherwise moving snow removal or de-icing
equipment or materials.
(b) A provision, clause, covenant, or agreement that is part of or in connection with a
snow removal and ice control services contract is against public policy and void if it does any of
the following: (1) requires, or has the effect of requiring, a service provider to indemnify a
service receiver for damages resulting from the acts or omissions of the service receiver or the
service receiver's agents or employees; (2) requires, or has the effect of requiring, a service
receiver to indemnify a service provider for damages resulting from the acts or omissions of the
service provider or the service provider's agents or employees; (3) requires, or has the effect of
requiring, a service provider to hold a service receiver harmless from any tort liability for
damages resulting from the acts or omissions of the service receiver or the service receiver's
agents or employees; (4) Requires, or has the effect of requiring, a service receiver to hold a
service provider harmless from any tort liability for damages resulting from the acts or omissions
of the service provider or the service provider's agents or employees.
of 2